Florida, session 2026, SB336.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âGay and 15 Transgender Panic Legal Defenses Prohibition Act.â 16 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that gay and transgender 17 panic legal defenses raised in criminal proceedings characterize 18 sexual orientation and gender expression or gender identity as 19 objectively reasonable excuses for a perpetratorâs loss of self 20 control, and that these defenses thereby illegitimately attempt 21 to mitigate the responsibility of the perpetrator for harm done 22 to lesbian, gay, bisexual, or transgender individuals. 23 Section 3.âSection 900.06, Florida Statutes, is created to 24 read: 25 900.06âUse of gay and transgender panic legal defenses 26 prohibited.â 27 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 28 (a)ââGender expressionâ or âgender identityâ means gender 29 related identity, appearance, or behavior, regardless of whether 30 such gender-related identity, appearance, or behavior is 31 different from that which is traditionally associated with a 32 personâs physiology or assigned sex at birth. 33 (b)ââSexual orientationâ means an individualâs actual or 34 perceived heterosexuality, homosexuality, or bisexuality. 35 (2)âA nonviolent sexual advance or the perception or 36 belief, even if inaccurate, of the sex, sexual orientation, 37 gender expression, or gender identity of an individual may not 38 be used as a defense to a criminal offense, to excuse or to 39 justify the conduct of an individual who commits a criminal 40 offense, or to mitigate the severity of a criminal offense 41 during sentencing. 42 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.